Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-355
Policies; premiums; report required.

Every agent or other representative of any company issuing a policy on its own behalf in this state shall report to the company the exact consideration charged and written in the policy as a premium for the risk.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 70, p. 424;

R.S.1913, § 3206;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. IV, § 40, p. 603;

C.S.1922, § 7805;

C.S.1929, § 44-340;

R.S.1943, § 44-355.